West Virginia, session 2026, HB4421.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 16A. WEST VIRGINIA PARKWAYS AUTHORITY. §17‑16A‑31.  Cessation of tolls. (a) Except as provided in this section, when all bonds issued under the provisions of this article in connection with any parkway project or projects and the interest on those bonds have been paid or a sufficient amount for the payment of those bonds and the interest on them to their maturity has been set aside in trust for the benefit of the bondholders, the project or projects, if then in good condition and repair to the satisfaction of the Commissioner of the state Division of Highways, shall be transferred to the state Division of Highways and shall thereafter be maintained by the state Division of Highways free of tolls.(b) Within 90 days of the final payment on all bonds authorized by this article, the Parkways Authority, or its successors, shall discontinue toll collection on the West Virginia Turnpike, all tolls shall be discontinued, and the associated toll facilities shall be removed. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home